Washington statutes.
RCW 36.34.190

Lease to highest responsible bidder.

No lease shall be made by the county except to the highest responsible bidder at the time of the hearing set forth in the notice of intention to lease.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.34.190. Prior: 1901 c 87 s 6, part; RRS s 4024, part.]